Colorado, session 2026A, SB130.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Short title. The short title of this act is the "Medical
Spa Prescription Drug Consumer Protection Act".
SECTION 2. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds that:
(a) Medical spas operating in Colorado increasingly provide
services involving the administration or use of prescription drugs,
-2- SB26-130

including injectable and sterile drug products, in facilities marketed
primarily for cosmetic, aesthetic, wellness, longevity, or lifestyle purposes
rather than as traditional health-care offices;
(b) Consumers may reasonably assume that prescription drugs
administered in medical spa settings are subject to uniform safety
standards and truthful representations, when in fact oversight varies
depending on the business model and the credentials of individual
practitioners;
(c) The improper acquisition, storage, handling, administration,
or marketing of prescription drugs in a medical spa setting presents a risk
of serious adverse events and patient harm, particularly when prescription
drugs are used without adequate clinical oversight or outside the scope of
a practitioner's license;
(d) The state has a compelling interest in preventing deceptive,
misleading, or unsafe business practices involving prescription drugs,
regardless of the setting in which those drugs are administered; and
(e) The "Colorado Consumer Protection Act", article 1 of title 6,
Colorado Revised Statutes, provides the attorney general and district
attorneys with established investigatory and enforcement authority to
address deceptive or unfair trade practices without the creation of a new
regulatory or licensing program.
(2) Therefore, the general assembly declares that the purposes of
this act are to:
(a) Establish clear, enforceable standards of conduct applicable to
medical spas that administer or use prescription drugs;
(b) Prohibit deceptive or unfair practices relating to the sourcing,
handling, administration, and representation of prescription drugs in
-3- SB26-130

medical spa settings;
(c) Authorize enforcement by the attorney general and district
attorneys under the "Colorado Consumer Protection Act";
(d) Avoid the creation of a new state registration, licensing, or
inspection program or the imposition of mandatory administrative duties
on a state agency; and
(e) Preserve the authority of existing professional regulatory
boards to regulate professionals within their respective scopes of practice.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 6-1-741 as
follows:
6-1-741. Medical spas - prohibited practices - enforcement -
rules - definitions.
(1) Definitions. AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT
OTHERWISE REQUIRES:
(a) "FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION" OR "FDA" MEANS THE
FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION IN THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT
OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, OR ANY SUCCESSOR ENTITY.
(b) "MEDICAL SPA" MEANS A FACILITY OR PRACTICE THAT:
(I) OFFERS OR PROVIDES MEDICAL HEALTH-CARE SERVICES;
(II) PREPARES, ADMINISTERS, DISPENSES, OR OTHERWISE USES
PRESCRIPTION DRUGS FOR INTRAVENOUS, INTRAMUSCULAR, OR
SUBCUTANEOUS DELIVERY; AND
(III) HOLDS ITSELF OUT TO THE PUBLIC AS PROVIDING COSMETIC,
AESTHETIC, WELLNESS, LONGEVITY, OR LIFESTYLE TREATMENTS,
INCLUDING WEIGHT LOSS SERVICES, BOTULINUM TOXIN INJECTIONS,
DERMAL FILLERS, HORMONE THERAPIES, HAIR LOSS TREATMENTS, OR
PARENTERAL NUTRIENT THERAPIES.
-4- SB26-130

(c) "PRESCRIPTION DRUG" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN
SECTION 12-280-103.
(d) "SERIOUS ADVERSE EVENT" MEANS AN ADVERSE EVENT
RESULTING IN DEATH, A LIFE-THREATENING CONDITION, INPATIENT
HOSPITALIZATION, PERSISTENT OR SIGNIFICANT DISABILITY, OR MEDICAL
INTERVENTION NECESSARY TO PREVENT SUCH OUTCOMES.
(2) Prohibited practices. A MEDICAL SPA ENGAGES IN AN UNFAIR
OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE UNDER THIS ARTICLE 1 WHEN, IN THE
COURSE OF ITS BUSINESS, VOCATION, OR OCCUPATION, THE MEDICAL SPA:
(a) ACQUIRES OR RECEIVES A PRESCRIPTION DRUG FROM A PERSON
NOT LEGALLY AUTHORIZED TO DISTRIBUTE OR TRANSFER THE
PRESCRIPTION DRUG;
(b) FAILS TO STORE, HANDLE, PREPARE, OR ADMINISTER A
PRESCRIPTION DRUG IN ACCORDANCE WITH MANUFACTURER
REQUIREMENTS, APPLICABLE FEDERAL AND STATE LAW, OR GENERALLY
ACCEPTED STANDARDS OF MEDICAL PRACTICE;
(c) PERMITS AN INDIVIDUAL TO PRESCRIBE OR ADMINISTER
PRESCRIPTION DRUGS OUTSIDE THE SCOPE OF THE INDIVIDUAL'S
STATE-ISSUED CREDENTIAL;
(d) FAILS TO MAINTAIN REASONABLE SAFEGUARDS TO PREVENT
CONTAMINATION, DIVERSION, THEFT, OR MISUSE OF PRESCRIPTION DRUGS;
(e) REPRESENTS THAT A PRESCRIPTION DRUG:
(I) IS SAFE OR EFFECTIVE IN A MANNER INCONSISTENT WITH
FEDERAL LAW OR FDA-APPROVED LABELING;
(II) HAS SPONSORSHIP, APPROVAL, CHARACTERISTICS,
INGREDIENTS, USES, OR BENEFITS THAT IT DOES NOT HAVE; OR
(III) IS APPROVED BY THE FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION WHEN
-5- SB26-130

IT IS NOT;
(f) FAILS TO DESIGNATE A LICENSED HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER WITH
PRESCRIPTIVE AUTHORITY TO PROVIDE CLINICAL OVERSIGHT OF
PRESCRIPTION DRUGS USED AT THE MEDICAL SPA; OR
(g) FAILS TO CREATE, MAINTAIN, OR PRODUCE TO THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL OR A DISTRICT ATTORNEY RECORDS OF SERIOUS ADVERSE
EVENTS REQUIRED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS SECTION.
(3) Records of serious adverse events.
(a) A MEDICAL SPA SHALL CREATE AND MAINTAIN INTERNAL
RECORDS OF A PATIENT'S SERIOUS ADVERSE EVENTS INVOLVING
PRESCRIPTION DRUGS ADMINISTERED AT THE MEDICAL SPA.
(b) RECORDS REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (3)(a) OF THIS
SECTION MUST BE PRODUCED UPON REQUEST OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
OR THE DISTRICT ATTORNEY WITH JURISDICTION OVER THE MEDICAL SPA
FOR PURPOSES OF ENFORCING THIS SECTION.
(c) RECORDS AND INFORMATION RELATING TO SERIOUS ADVERSE
EVENTS ARE CONFIDENTIAL AND ARE NOT SUBJECT TO PUBLIC INSPECTION
PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-72-204 (2).
(4) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY ADOPT RULES TO IMPLEMENT
THIS SECTION.
SECTION 4. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
general assembly (August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13,
2026); except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1
(3) of article V of the state constitution against this act or an item, section,
or part of this act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part
-6- SB26-130

will not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election
to be held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the
date of the official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
(2) This act applies to actions taken on or after the applicable
effective date of this act.
-7- SB26-130